Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1904
Lien; strike from record; when.

Any lien determined to be a nonconsensual common-law lien pursuant to any proceeding shall be stricken from the record of the Secretary of State, county clerk, register of deeds, or clerk of any court upon the issuing of a valid court order from a court of competent jurisdiction. There shall be no filing fee for a court order issued pursuant to this section.

Laws 2003, LB 655, § 4.